public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-oxt/dictionaries/vec.aff
FLAG UTF-8
SFX A ar ème/H xberlefar
SFX A ar ème/H xberlotar
SFX A ar ème/H xberlumar
SFX A ar ème/H xberxelar
SFX A ar ème/H xelar
SFX A ar ème/H xermojar
SFX A ar ème/H xgoñar
SFX A ar ème/H xlargiđar
SFX A ar ème/H xmerdar
SFX A ar ème/H xmerejar
SFX A ar ème/H xmeriliar
SFX A ar ème/H xmerŧiar
SFX A ar ème/H xmorgolar
SFX A ar ème/H xnervađar
SFX A ar ème/H xvergoñaŧar
SFX A ar ème/H đurar
SFX A ar ème/H ŧercar
SFX A ar ème/H ŧitar
SFX A ar èu/Q [abcdefmnpstvxñđŧ]olar
SFX A ar èu/Q [abcdfgijknopstvxŧ]etar
SFX A ar èu/Q [abcdfjkmpsv]iđar
SFX A ar èu/Q [abcdfklnoprstuvxđŧ]inar
SFX A ar èu/Q [abcefgijklmnpsvxđŧ]onar
SFX A ar èu/Q [abdefklmopsvx]itar
SFX A ar èu/Q [abdfgijklmnpstxñđ]orar
SFX A ar èu/Q [abdfgikmst]urar
SFX A ar èu/Q [abdfijkmnprstuŧ]elar
SFX A ar èu/Q [abdgiotu]riđar
SFX A ar èu/Q [abfgptu]regar
SFX A ar èu/Q [abfjlnpr]utar
SFX A ar èu/Q [abfkx]renar
SFX A ar èu/Q [abfot]raŧar
SFX A ar èu/Q [abik]rokar
SFX A ar èu/Q [abikoptu]riar
SFX A ar èu/Q [adiopt]ronar
SFX A ar èu/Q [adklpstuvđŧ]enar
SFX A ar èu/Q [aeilnsu]kar
SFX A ar èu/Q [aeinosu]tegar
SFX A ar èu/Q [aeio]strar
SFX A ar èu/Q [aeiop]letar
SFX A ar èu/Q [aeiou]xenar
SFX A ar èu/Q [aeiru]ñar
SFX A ar èu/Q [aeiu]ngar
SFX A ar èu/Q [aeiu]ŧiar
SFX A ar èu/Q [aelo]var
SFX A ar èu/Q [aenoux]golar
SFX A ar èu/Q [aeo]liar
SFX A ar èu/Q [aeors]tiđar
SFX A ar èu/Q [aeou]mentar
SFX A ar èu/Q [agot]rejar
SFX A ar èu/Q [ai]erar
SFX A ar èu/Q [ai]ñaŧar
SFX A ar èu/Q [ail]gar
SFX A ar èu/Q [ailnou]sar
SFX A ar èu/Q [ailnu]bar
SFX A ar èu/Q [ailu]minar
SFX A ar èu/Q [aiou]rmar
SFX A ar èu/Q [aisu]kiar
SFX A ar èu/Q [aku]rifegar
SFX A ar èu/Q [als]tar
SFX A ar èu/Q [an]deđar
SFX A ar èu/Q [an]fraxar
SFX A ar èu/Q [an]kuerar
SFX A ar èu/Q [an]kuirar
SFX A ar èu/Q [ano]fegar
SFX A ar èu/Q [ao]niđar
SFX A ar èu/Q [ao]rcar
SFX A ar èu/Q [ao]rdar
SFX A ar èu/Q [ao]rdonar
SFX A ar èu/Q [ao]rkar
SFX A ar èu/Q [ao]rnar
SFX A ar èu/Q [ao]rsar
SFX A ar èu/Q [aou]nŧiar
SFX A ar èu/Q [aou]rbar
SFX A ar èu/Q [aou]rgar
SFX A ar èu/Q [aou]rkiar
SFX A ar èu/Q [aou]rlar
SFX A ar èu/Q [aou]rtar
SFX A ar èu/Q [aou]rŧar
SFX A ar èu/Q [ar]naliđar
SFX A ar èu/Q [aux]nar
SFX A ar èu/Q [bcdefgijmnpsvxđŧ]otar
SFX A ar èu/Q [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A ar èu/Q [bcfgiklnoprtŧ]eđar
SFX A ar èu/Q [bcfgjklmnoptuv]aŧar
SFX A ar èu/Q [bcfilrtđ]ugar
SFX A ar èu/Q [bcmpruŧ]efar
SFX A ar èu/Q [bdegikmprstđ]aliđar
SFX A ar èu/Q [bdflmvđ]ogar
SFX A ar èu/Q [bdfmnptvx]iar
SFX A ar èu/Q [bdgklmnptuv]ajar
SFX A ar èu/Q [bdgkpv]rar
SFX A ar èu/Q [bdilmnopsvxñđŧ]egar
SFX A ar èu/Q [bdklmoprtuv]acar
SFX A ar èu/Q [bfilmtuv]antar
SFX A ar èu/Q [bgknpstv]axar
SFX A ar èu/Q [bjklmrt]oŧar
SFX A ar èu/Q [blmpstvx]irar
SFX A ar èu/Q [blprsvx]ear
SFX A ar èu/Q [bmnpxŧ]igolar
SFX A ar èu/Q [bmtŧ]iliar
SFX A ar èu/Q [bou]rogar
SFX A ar èu/Q [bp]erlar
SFX A ar èu/Q [btv]ergar
SFX A ar èu/Q [bxŧ]eregar
SFX A ar èu/Q [cfglopsv]esar
SFX A ar èu/Q [clmnrsv]odar
SFX A ar èu/Q [dfgklmnopst]ejar
SFX A ar èu/Q [dg]obar
SFX A ar èu/Q [dgkmnprs]uar
SFX A ar èu/Q [dijlorstuvxđ]entar
SFX A ar èu/Q [dlnstxñŧ]ifegar
SFX A ar èu/Q [dltv]ernar
SFX A ar èu/Q [eilnu]ŧar
SFX A ar èu/Q [eilox]mar
SFX A ar èu/Q [einoru]xar
SFX A ar èu/Q [einosu]car
SFX A ar èu/Q [eio]ndar
SFX A ar èu/Q [eiu]xurar
SFX A ar èu/Q [eo]liđar
SFX A ar èu/Q [eo]ntiđar
SFX A ar èu/Q [es]kotar
SFX A ar èu/Q [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ar èu/Q [fjkx]ermar
SFX A ar èu/Q [fklrsx]oñar
SFX A ar èu/Q [fm]eretar
SFX A ar èu/Q [fpvŧ]iolar
SFX A ar èu/Q [fŧ]etuar
SFX A ar èu/Q [gin]ritar
SFX A ar èu/Q [iln]trar
SFX A ar èu/Q [inru]jar
SFX A ar èu/Q [io]ntar
SFX A ar èu/Q [io]rkolar
SFX A ar èu/Q [ipt]ađar
SFX A ar èu/Q [ipu]lar
SFX A ar èu/Q [irst]umar
SFX A ar èu/Q [klt]ivar
SFX A ar èu/Q [kp]avejar
SFX A ar èu/Q [kt]erŧar
SFX A ar èu/Q [lmtxŧ]enŧiar
SFX A ar èu/Q [ln]etrar
SFX A ar èu/Q [lnoru]đar
SFX A ar èu/Q [mp]eritar
SFX A ar èu/Q [mpux]andar
SFX A ar èu/Q [mv]ergolar
SFX A ar èu/Q [ns]erbar
SFX A ar èu/Q [ns]ervar
SFX A ar èu/Q [ns]kuercar
SFX A ar èu/Q [nsv]edar
SFX A ar èu/Q [nx]goŧar
SFX A ar èu/Q [op]ar
SFX A ar èu/Q [ox]longar
SFX A ar èu/Q [pt]resar
SFX A ar èu/Q [pt]rotar
SFX A ar èu/Q [stŧ]imentar
SFX A ar èu/Q [sŧ]erkar
SFX A ar èu/Q [tuv]iliđar
SFX A ar èu/Q [tv]eriđar
SFX A ar èu/Q [tv]erniđar
SFX A ar èu/Q [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ar èu/Q alar
SFX A ar èu/Q alienar
SFX A ar èu/Q amar
SFX A ar èu/Q andar
SFX A ar èu/Q arar
SFX A ar èu/Q bersajar
SFX A ar èu/Q bertonar
SFX A ar èu/Q bordeđar
SFX A ar èu/Q dar
SFX A ar èu/Q deramar
SFX A ar èu/Q derenar
SFX A ar èu/Q derivar
SFX A ar èu/Q derobar
SFX A ar èu/Q derokar
SFX A ar èu/Q derotar
SFX A ar èu/Q desferenŧiar
SFX A ar èu/Q devorar
SFX A ar èu/Q devorŧiar
SFX A ar èu/Q dexeredar
SFX A ar èu/Q dexverxenar
SFX A ar èu/Q donar
SFX A ar èu/Q exerŧitar
SFX A ar èu/Q far
SFX A ar èu/Q fermentar
SFX A ar èu/Q fumar
SFX A ar èu/Q griliar
SFX A ar èu/Q guernar
SFX A ar èu/Q inbaretar
SFX A ar èu/Q infervorar
SFX A ar èu/Q inkartonar
SFX A ar èu/Q intarsiar
SFX A ar èu/Q interesar
SFX A ar èu/Q interkalar
SFX A ar èu/Q interkuerar
SFX A ar èu/Q interkuirar
SFX A ar èu/Q interlinear
SFX A ar èu/Q intermeđar
SFX A ar èu/Q interogar
SFX A ar èu/Q interpretar
SFX A ar èu/Q inveriar
SFX A ar èu/Q inversiar
SFX A ar èu/Q inŧercelar
SFX A ar èu/Q kalar
SFX A ar èu/Q kalefar
SFX A ar èu/Q kantar
SFX A ar èu/Q kolar
SFX A ar èu/Q korniđar
SFX A ar èu/Q kriolar
SFX A ar èu/Q kurvar
SFX A ar èu/Q lotar
SFX A ar èu/Q lumar
SFX A ar èu/Q lustrar
SFX A ar èu/Q maravejar
SFX A ar èu/Q menar
SFX A ar èu/Q meravejar
SFX A ar èu/Q merkantar
SFX A ar èu/Q merkantiđar
SFX A ar èu/Q međar
SFX A ar èu/Q mojar
SFX A ar èu/Q mudarar
SFX A ar èu/Q ojar
SFX A ar èu/Q okar
SFX A ar èu/Q ormeđar
SFX A ar èu/Q perdonar
SFX A ar èu/Q perfumar
SFX A ar èu/Q perifraxar
SFX A ar èu/Q periodar
SFX A ar èu/Q perkolar
SFX A ar èu/Q perkotar
SFX A ar èu/Q perletar
SFX A ar èu/Q perlustrar
SFX A ar èu/Q permudarar
SFX A ar èu/Q permutar
SFX A ar èu/Q perorar
SFX A ar èu/Q perpetrar
SFX A ar èu/Q perpetuar
SFX A ar èu/Q perseguitar
SFX A ar èu/Q personaliđar
SFX A ar èu/Q persugar
SFX A ar èu/Q pertegar
SFX A ar èu/Q pongar
SFX A ar èu/Q rajar
SFX A ar èu/Q ramar
SFX A ar èu/Q raxar
SFX A ar èu/Q redar
SFX A ar èu/Q rigolar
SFX A ar èu/Q rivar
SFX A ar èu/Q robar
SFX A ar èu/Q roersar
SFX A ar èu/Q rolar
SFX A ar èu/Q sajar
SFX A ar èu/Q scantiđar
SFX A ar èu/Q seguitar
SFX A ar èu/Q serajar
SFX A ar èu/Q siar
SFX A ar èu/Q skortegar
SFX A ar èu/Q sotolinear
SFX A ar èu/Q soverkiar
SFX A ar èu/Q spergoŧar
SFX A ar èu/Q sperimentar
SFX A ar èu/Q sperlongar
SFX A ar èu/Q spernacar
SFX A ar èu/Q speronar
SFX A ar èu/Q sperđurar
SFX A ar èu/Q steriliđar
SFX A ar èu/Q sugar
SFX A ar èu/Q terapienar
SFX A ar èu/Q teraŧar
SFX A ar èu/Q termenar
SFX A ar èu/Q terminar
SFX A ar èu/Q terŧariolar
SFX A ar èu/Q tonar
SFX A ar èu/Q tormentar
SFX A ar èu/Q tuar
SFX A ar èu/Q vejar
SFX A ar èu/Q velar
SFX A ar èu/Q verdeđar
SFX A ar èu/Q vergiđar
SFX A ar èu/Q vergoñar
SFX A ar èu/Q verifegar
SFX A ar èu/Q verigolar
SFX A ar èu/Q verolar
SFX A ar èu/Q versar
SFX A ar èu/Q verxurar
SFX A ar èu/Q verđelar
SFX A ar èu/Q xberlefar
SFX A ar èu/Q xberlotar
SFX A ar èu/Q xberlumar
SFX A ar èu/Q xberxelar
SFX A ar èu/Q xelar
SFX A ar èu/Q xermojar
SFX A ar èu/Q xgoñar
SFX A ar èu/Q xlargiđar
SFX A ar èu/Q xmerdar
SFX A ar èu/Q xmerejar
SFX A ar èu/Q xmeriliar
SFX A ar èu/Q xmerŧiar
SFX A ar èu/Q xmorgolar
SFX A ar èu/Q xnervađar
SFX A ar èu/Q xvergoñaŧar
SFX A ar èu/Q đurar
SFX A ar èu/Q ŧercar
SFX A ar èu/Q ŧitar
SFX A ar é/FP [abcdefmnpstvxñđŧ]olar
SFX A ar é/FP [abcdfgijknopstvxŧ]etar
SFX A ar é/FP [abcdfjkmpsv]iđar
SFX A ar é/FP [abcdfklnoprstuvxđŧ]inar
SFX A ar é/FP [abcefgijklmnpsvxđŧ]onar
SFX A ar é/FP [abdefklmopsvx]itar
SFX A ar é/FP [abdfgijklmnpstxñđ]orar
SFX A ar é/FP [abdfgikmst]urar
SFX A ar é/FP [abdfijkmnprstuŧ]elar
SFX A ar é/FP [abdgiotu]riđar
SFX A ar é/FP [abfgptu]regar
SFX A ar é/FP [abfjlnpr]utar
SFX A ar é/FP [abfkx]renar
SFX A ar é/FP [abfot]raŧar
SFX A ar é/FP [abik]rokar
