public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-oxt/dictionaries/vec.dic
inagrir/A
alborar/A
alŧar/A
reandar/A
ansimar/A
arđerar/A
aromatiđar/A
subastar/A
inaŧidar/A
aver/A
babar/A
xbagaŧar/A
bakanar/A
balanŧar/A
xbalonar/A
inbalŧar/A
bandonar/A
baokar/A
xbaraŧar/A
inbarkar/A
arbasar/A
inbàter/A
xbatolar/A
inbavar/A
xbaxukiar/A
bekonar/A
xberlotar/A
xbeŧolar/A
biankir/A
xbiaxemar/A
konbinar/A
birar/A
biskolar/A
blokar/A
rebóɉer/A
trabokar/A
xboloñar/A
inbonar/A
inbonbegar/A
bordir/A
exborsar/A
inbotir/A
xboŧar/A
inbragar/A
xbraɉar/A
inbrandir/A
bravar/A
brigar/A
brivar/A
inbroɉar/A
inbronbar/A
inbrumar/A
budelar/A
inbulir/A
inbustar/A
buxerar/A
capar/A
scatar/A
celerar/A
mancèñer/A
intracéñer/A
precetar/A
scinkar/A
copar/A
kontradir/A
datar/A
indemoniar/A
xderenar/A
devorŧiar/A
dixdisiar/A
redíxer/A
doler/A
domenar/A
dexdopiar/A
indormir/A
xdotoređar/A
indubitar/A
redúxer/A
đavariar/A
đónxer/A
rinđovenar/A
ebraiđar/A
reelèđer/A
entuxiaxmar/A
esplòder/A
exaurir/A
exular/A
refar/A
fadar/A
infaldar/A
falsar/A
sfangar/A
fasar/A
faŧar/A
anplifegar/A
mortifegar/A
speŧifegar/A
sfenir/A
ferir/A
desferenŧiar/A
infestonar/A
infiar/A
sfiankar/A
desfibiar/A
sfidar/A
defilar/A
finar/A
infiokar/A
sfioriđar/A
fiskar/A
infiubar/A
fodrar/A
fojar/A
folgorar/A
forar/A
formar/A
informigar/A
renforŧar/A
fradeliđar/A
frantonar/A
frasar/A
fratonar/A
rafredir/A
frexar/A
fritolar/A
sfronxar/A
fugar/A
fumar/A
furegar/A
refúxer/A
ingaɉar/A
galonar/A
xganasar/A
xgañolir/A
garbiđar/A
ingarofolir/A
ingatolar/A
ingetar/A
ingobar/A
paragonar/A
xgorgar/A
dexgradar/A
granir/A
dexgrandenar/A
granxir/A
ingraŧianir/A
agredir/A
xgrendenar/A
grilar/A
xgriñolir/A
ingrixolir/A
ingrosar/A
guar/A
xguainar/A
guastar/A
ingurar/A
inguxelar/A
inberir/A
indulxentar/A
ingrotolir/A
malinpresionar/A
insosolar/A
intiriŧir/A
inxavaskar/A
iŧar/A
jutar/A
xɉedolar/A
ɉetar/A
ɉoŧolar/A
kabalar/A
inkaenar/A
kaiđar/A
kalibrar/A
kalkiđolar/A
skaltrir/A
kaluñar/A
deskanar/A
inkandir/A
inkankrenar/A
kanpionar/A
skantonar/A
kaparar/A
rekapitolar/A
inkapuŧar/A
skaregar/A
skarmir/A
deskaroñar/A
karteđar/A
kasar/A
inkastelar/A
inkatarar/A
inkatigar/A
deskaŧar/A
eskavar/A
skavalkar/A
kaxermar/A
inklúder/A
skofonar/A
inkokar/A
kolar/A
inkolorar/A
komandar/A
komisionar/A
konbàter/A
konfuxionar/A
konpanadegar/A
kontentar/A
koñer/A
deskoraɉir/A
inkorlar/A
kostar/A
skovolar/A
krexemar/A
inkrostar/A
skuadrar/A
deskuèrđer/A
inkular/A
kurioxar/A
xlanegar/A
delapidar/A
xlavar/A
deleguar/A
xlevar/A
likar/A
liŧenŧiar/A
sprolongar/A
lumar/A
inmacar/A
malar/A
dexmanegar/A
stramañar/A
maridar/A
dexmaselar/A
matonar/A
medegar/A
malmenar/A
dexmerdar/A
kométer/A
migrar/A
xmisiar/A
amolir/A
dexmontar/A
morbidir/A
inmortalar/A
mucar/A
dexmunegar/A
mutolir/A
xnaturar/A
netar/A
noleđar/A
inuvolir/A
ociđar/A
olsar/A
oparar/A
orixenar/A
oviar/A
pagar/A
spalar/A
despaltanar/A
spanŧar/A
rekonparir/A
spartar/A
paskolar/A
patinar/A
spavenar/A
pelar/A
spenaŧar/A
inpenolar/A
despèrder/A
repeskar/A
spetolar/A
piadeđar/A
despiàxer/A
pilar/A
pipar/A
pitufar/A
aplikar/A
despolverar/A
opóner/A
despontar/A
popetar/A
inposesar/A
repoxar/A
inprestar/A
privar/A
spulegar/A
putanar/A
rafar/A
rangar/A
rascar/A
rekamar/A
arestar/A
riscar/A
koròder/A
arolar/A
rosir/A
inruđenir/A
ruviɉar/A
sakeđar/A
salpar/A
sanɉutar/A
saxar/A
sedar/A
inseguir/A
konsejar/A
seneɉar/A
señorar/A
asestar/A
sibilar/A
sindakar/A
skajar/A
iskarpiar/A
skermar/A
skortar/A
skrivakiar/A
desolar/A
someɉar/A
sordir/A
sparañar/A
prosperar/A
spigar/A
splénder/A
spuar/A
kontrastajar/A
konstatar/A
stilar/A
destivar/A
destrakar/A
striar/A
strukolar/A
stupir/A
sugar/A
resusitar/A
taɉar/A
stanar/A
tardar/A
tasteɉar/A
intelerar/A
tenkar/A
tenutar/A
apartèñer/A
otéñer/A
terŧariolar/A
tinpanar/A
intokar/A
tonfar/A
destornar/A
dexintosegar/A
trakar/A
intrapolar/A
intravaɉar/A
tribolar/A
destronar/A
tuar/A
inŧanpar/A
ŧenɉar/A
ŧèrner/A
ŧiganar/A
ŧirkondar/A
ŧukarar/A
ustegar/A
valer/A
xvanŧar/A
prevéder/A
invelenar/A
xventolar/A
skonveñir/A
reverir/A
verniđar/A
vesar/A
dexvidar/A
violar/A
provixionar/A
xvolar/A
koinvòlxer/A
sotoxàser/A
xbuandar/A
rexetar/A
xmerejar/A
xufolar/A
